California statutes. Labor Code
 the weekly gross payroll of the employer at the time of the posting of the bond, whichever is greater, and that the term of the bond be for the duration of the service of the employee who brought the action, until past due wages have been paid, or until satisfaction of all judgments for nonpayment of wages. The bond shall also be payable for wages, interest on wages and for any damages arising from any violation of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and for any other monetary relief awarded to an employee as a result of a violation of this code. To aid in the enforcement of this section, upon a request by the Labor Commissioner or an employee bringing an action pursuant to this section, the court may additionally require the employer to provide an accounting of assets of the employer, including a list of all bank accounts, accounts receivable, personal property, real property, automobiles or other vehicles, and any other assets, in a form and manner as prescribed by the court. An employer shall
 provide an amended accounting of assets if ordered by the court to do so. If, within 10 days after a demand for an accounting of assets, which demand may be made by certified or registered mail, the employer shall fail to provide an accounting, or if the employer fails to provide an amended accounting being ordered to do so, the court may take all appropriate action to enforce its order, including the imposition of appropriate sanctions.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), an employer shall be deemed to have been convicted of having violated this article or to have failed to satisfy a judgment for the second time within 10 years if, to secure labor or personal services in connection with his or her business, the employer uses the services of an agent, contractor, or subcontractor who is convicted of a violation of this article or fails to satisfy a judgment for wages respecting those employees, or both, but only if the employer had actual
 knowledge of the person’s failure to pay wages. In issuing a temporary restraining order pursuant to this section, the court, in determining the amount and term of the bond, shall count the agent’s, contractor’s, or subcontractor’s employees as part of the employer’s total workforce. This subdivision shall not apply where a temporary restraining order against the agent, contractor, or subcontractor as an employer has been issued pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) An employer who, for the third time within 10 years of the first occurrence, is alleged to have violated this article or to have failed to satisfy a judgment for nonpayment of wages, or both, shall be deemed by the court to have commenced a new five-year period for which the posting of a bond may be ordered in accordance with subdivision (b), except that the court may, in its discretion, require the posting of a bond in a greater amount as it determines appropriate under the
 circumstances.

(e) A former employee who was a party to an earlier action against an employer in which a judgment for the payment of wages was obtained, and who alleges that the employer has failed to satisfy the judgment for the payment of wages, in addition to any other available remedy, may petition the court pursuant to subdivision (b) for a temporary restraining order against the employer to cease doing business in this state unless the employer posts a bond with the court.

(f) Actions brought pursuant to this section shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date, and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence may be given by law.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any mandatory duties on the Labor
 Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 6.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

244.

(a) An individual is not required to exhaust administrative remedies or procedures in order to bring a civil action under any provision of this code, unless that section under which the action is brought expressly requires exhaustion of an administrative remedy. This subdivision shall not be construed to affect the requirements of Section 2699.3.

(b) Reporting or threatening to report an employee’s, former employee’s, or prospective employee’s suspected citizenship or immigration status, or the suspected citizenship or immigration status of a family member of the employee, former employee, or prospective employee, to a federal, state, or local agency because the employee, former employee, or prospective
 employee exercises a right under the provisions of this code, the Government Code, or the Civil Code constitutes an adverse action for purposes of establishing a violation of an employee’s, former employee’s, or prospective employee’s rights. As used in this subdivision, “family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, cousin, grandparent, or grandchild related by blood, adoption, marriage, or domestic partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 577, Sec. 4.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Paid Sick Days [245. - 249.]

245.

(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Workplaces, Healthy Families Act of 2014.

(b) The provisions of this article are in addition to and independent of any other rights, remedies, or procedures available under any other law and do not diminish, alter, or negate any other legal rights, remedies, or procedures available to an aggrieved person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 317, Sec. 3.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

245.5.

As used in this article:

(a) “Employee” does not include the following:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 246.5, an employee covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees, and expressly provides for paid sick days or a paid leave or paid time off policy that permits the use of sick days for those employees, final and binding arbitration of disputes concerning the application of its paid sick days provisions, premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked, and regular hourly rate of pay of not less than 30 percent more
 than the state minimum wage rate.

(2) An employee in the construction industry covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees, premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked, and regular hourly pay of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate, and the agreement either (A) was entered into before January 1, 2015, or (B) expressly waives the requirements of this article in clear and unambiguous terms. For purposes of this subparagraph, “employee in the construction industry” means an employee performing work associated with construction, including work involving alteration, demolition, building, excavation, renovation, remodeling, maintenance, improvement, repair work, and any other work as described by Chapter
 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and other similar or related occupations or trades.

(3) An individual employed by an air carrier as a flight deck or cabin crew member that is subject to Title II of the federal Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), provided that the individual is provided with compensated time off equal to or exceeding the amount established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 246.

(4) An employee of the state, city, county, city and county, district, or any other public entity who is a recipient of a retirement allowance and employed without reinstatement into the employee’s respective retirement system pursuant to either Article 8 (commencing with Section 21220) of Chapter 12 of Part 3 of
 Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or Article 8 (commencing with Section 31670) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(5) An employee as defined in Section 351(d) of Title 45 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) “Employer” means any person employing another under any appointment or contract of hire and includes the state, political subdivisions of the state, and municipalities.

(2) “Employer” does not include any employer described in Section 351(a) of Title 45 of the United States Code.

(c) “Family member” means any of the following:

(1) A child, which for purposes of this article means a biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, legal ward, or a child to whom the employee stands in loco parentis. This definition of a child is applicable regardless of age or dependency status.

(2) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of an employee or the employee’s spouse or registered domestic partner, or a person who stood in loco parentis when the employee was a minor child.

(3) A spouse.

(4) A registered domestic partner.

(5) A grandparent.

(6) A grandchild.

(7) A sibling.

(8) A designated person, which, for purposes of this article, means a person identified by the employee at the time the employee requests paid sick days. An employer may limit an employee to one designated person per 12-month period for paid sick days.

(d) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.

(e) “Paid sick days” means time that is compensated at the same wage as the employee normally earns during regular work hours and is provided by an employer to an employee for the purposes described in Section 246.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

246.

(a) (1) An employee who, on or after July 1, 2015, works in California for the same employer for 30 or more days within a year from the commencement of employment is entitled to paid sick days as specified in this section. For an individual provider of waiver personal care services under Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code who also provides in-home supportive services in an applicable month, eligibility shall be determined based on the aggregate number of monthly hours worked between in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14132.971.

(2) On and after July 1, 2018, a provider of in-home
 supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, who works in California for 30 or more days within a year from the commencement of employment is entitled to paid sick days as specified in subdivision (e) and subject to the rate of accrual in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). For an individual provider of waiver personal care services under Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, entitlement to paid sick days begins on July 1, 2019.

(b) (1) An employee shall accrue paid sick days at the rate of not less than one hour per every 30 hours worked, beginning at the commencement of employment or the operative date of this article, whichever is later, subject to
 the use and accrual limitations set forth in this section.

(2) An employee who is exempt from overtime requirements as an administrative, executive, or professional employee under a wage order of the Industrial Welfare Commission is deemed to work 40 hours per workweek for the purposes of this section, unless the employee’s normal workweek is less than 40 hours, in which case the employee shall accrue paid sick days based upon that normal workweek.

(3) An employer may use a different accrual method, other than providing one hour per every 30 hours worked, provided that the accrual is on a regular basis so that an employee has no less than
 24 hours of accrued sick leave or paid time off by the 120th calendar day of employment or each calendar year, or in each 12-month period, and no less than 40 hours of accrued sick leave or paid time off by the 200th calendar day of employment or each calendar year, or in each 12-month period.

(4) An employer may satisfy the accrual requirements of this section by providing not less than
 24 hours or 3 days of paid sick leave that is available to the employee to use by the completion of the employee’s 120th calendar day of employment, and no less than 40 hours or 5 days of paid sick leave that is available to the employee to use by the completion of the employee’s 200th calendar day of employment.

(c) An employee shall be entitled to use accrued paid sick days beginning on the 90th day of employment, after which day the employee may use paid sick days as they are accrued.

(d) Accrued paid sick days shall carry over to the following year of employment. However, an employer may limit an employee’s use of accrued paid sick days to 40 hours or
 five days in each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period. This section shall be satisfied and no accrual or carryover is required if the full amount of leave is received at the beginning of each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period. The term “full amount of leave” means five days or 40 hours.

(e) For a provider of in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, and an individual provider of waiver personal care services under Section 14132.97 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, the term “full amount of leave” is defined as follows:

(1) Eight hours or one day in each year of employment, calendar year, or
 12-month period beginning July 1, 2018.

(2) Sixteen hours or two days in each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period beginning when the minimum wage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 and accounting for any years postponed under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1182.12, has reached thirteen dollars ($13) per hour.

(3) Twenty-four hours or three days in each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period beginning when the minimum wage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 and accounting for any years postponed under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1182.12, has reached fifteen dollars ($15) per hour.

(4) Forty hours or five days in each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period beginning January 1, 2024. 

(f) An employer is not required to provide additional paid sick days pursuant to this section if the employer has a paid leave policy or paid time off policy, the employer makes available an amount of leave applicable to employees that may be used for the same purposes and under the same conditions as specified in this section, and the policy satisfies one of the following:

(1) Satisfies the accrual, carryover, and use requirements of this section.

(2) Provided paid sick leave or paid time off to a class of employees before January 1, 2015,
 pursuant to a sick leave policy or paid time off policy that used an accrual method different than providing one hour per 30 hours worked, provided that the accrual is on a regular basis so that an employee, including an employee hired into that class after January 1, 2015, has no less than one day or eight hours of accrued sick leave or paid time off within three months of employment of each calendar year, or each 12-month period, and the employee was eligible to earn at least five days or 40 hours of sick leave or paid time off within six months of employment. If an employer modifies the accrual method used in the policy it had in place prior to January 1, 2015, the employer shall comply with any accrual method set forth in subdivision (b) or provide the full amount of leave at the beginning of each year of employment, calendar year, or 12-month period. This section does not prohibit the employer
 from increasing the accrual amount or rate for a class of employees covered by this subdivision.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, sick leave benefits provided pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19859 to 19868.3, inclusive, of the Government Code, or annual leave benefits provided
 pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19858.3 to 19858.7, inclusive, of the Government Code, or by provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 that incorporate or supersede provisions of Section 19859 to 19868.3, inclusive, or Sections 19858.3 to 19858.7, inclusive, of the Government Code, meet the requirements of this section.

(g) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), an employer is not required to provide compensation to an employee for accrued, unused paid sick days upon termination, resignation, retirement, or other separation from employment.

(2) If an employee separates from an employer and is rehired by the employer within one year from the date of separation, previously accrued and unused paid sick
 days shall be reinstated. The employee shall be entitled to use those previously accrued and unused paid sick days and to accrue additional paid sick days upon rehiring, subject to the use and accrual limitations set forth in this section. An employer is not required to reinstate accrued paid time off to an employee that was paid out at the time of termination, resignation, or separation of employment.

(h) An employer may lend paid sick days to an employee in advance of accrual, at the employer’s discretion and with proper documentation.

(i) An employer shall provide an employee with written notice that sets forth the amount of paid sick leave available, or paid time off leave an employer provides in lieu of sick leave, for use on either the employee’s itemized wage statement
 described in Section 226 or in a separate writing provided on the designated pay date with the employee’s payment of wages. If an employer provides unlimited paid sick leave or unlimited paid time off to an employee, the employer may satisfy this section by indicating on the notice or the employee’s itemized wage statement “unlimited.” The penalties described in this article for a violation of this subdivision shall be in lieu of the penalties for a violation of Section 226. This subdivision shall apply to employers covered by Wage Order 11 or 12 of the Industrial Welfare Commission only on and after January 21, 2016.

(j) An employer has no obligation under this section to allow an employee’s total accrual of paid sick leave to exceed
 80 hours or 10 days, provided that an employee’s rights to accrue and use paid sick leave are not limited other than as allowed under this section.

(k) An employee may determine how much paid sick leave they need to use, provided that an employer may set a reasonable minimum increment, not to exceed two hours, for the use of paid sick leave.

(l) For the purposes of this section, an employer shall calculate paid sick leave using any of the following calculations:

(1) Paid sick time for nonexempt
 employees shall be calculated in the same manner as the regular rate of pay for the workweek in which the employee uses paid sick time, whether or not the employee actually works overtime in that workweek.

(2) Paid sick time for nonexempt employees shall be calculated by dividing the employee’s total wages, not including overtime premium pay, by the employee’s total hours worked in the full pay periods of the prior 90 days of employment.

(3) Paid sick time for exempt employees shall be calculated in the same manner as the employer calculates wages for other forms of paid leave time.

(m) If the need for paid sick leave is foreseeable, the employee shall provide reasonable advance notification. If the need for paid sick
 leave is unforeseeable, the employee shall provide notice of the need for the leave as soon as practicable.

(n) An employer shall provide payment for sick leave taken by an employee no later than the payday for the next regular payroll period after the sick leave was taken.

(o) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with stakeholders, shall convene a workgroup to implement paid sick leave for in-home supportive services providers as specified in this section. This workgroup shall finish its implementation
 work by November 1, 2017, and the State Department of Social Services shall issue guidance such as an all-county letter or similar instructions by December 1, 2017.

(p) No later than February 1, 2019, the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the Department of Finance and stakeholders, shall reconvene the paid sick leave workgroup for in-home supportive services providers. The workgroup shall discuss how paid sick leave affects the provision of in-home supportive services. The workgroup shall consider the potential need for a process to cover an in-home supportive services recipient’s authorized hours when a provider needs to utilize their sick time. This workgroup shall finish its work by November 1, 2019.

(q) Notwithstanding the
 rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of an all-county letter, or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(r) Subdivisions (g), (h), (i), (l), (m), and (n) shall preempt any local ordinance to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 309, Sec. 2.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

246.5.

(a) Upon the oral or written request of an employee, an employer shall provide paid sick days for the following purposes:

(1) Diagnosis, care, or treatment of an existing health condition of, or preventive care for, an employee or an employee’s family member.

(2) (A) For leave taken or requested on or before December 31, 2024, for a purpose described in subdivision (c) of Section 230 or subdivision (a) of Section 230.1.

(B) For leave taken or requested on or after January 1, 2025, for a purpose described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of, or subdivision (b) of, Section 12945.8 of the Government
 Code.

(C) For leave taken or requested on or after January 1, 2026, for a purpose described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 12945.8 of the Government Code.

(3) (A) For an employee who is an agricultural employee, as defined in Section 9110, who works outside and who is entitled to paid sick days under this article, to avoid smoke, heat, or flooding conditions created by a local or state emergency, including, but not limited to, when the employee’s worksite is closed due to the smoke, heat, or flooding conditions.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, there are smoke, heat, or flood conditions created by a local or state emergency if the Governor proclaims a state of emergency pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or a local emergency is proclaimed
 pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code, due to smoke, heat, or flooding conditions that prevent agricultural employees from working.

(b) An employer shall not require as a condition of using paid sick days that the employee search for or find a replacement worker to cover the days during which the employee uses paid sick days.

(c) (1) An employer shall not deny an employee the right to use accrued sick days, discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, or in any manner discriminate against an employee for using accrued sick days, attempting to exercise the right to use accrued sick days, filing a complaint with the department or alleging a violation of this article, cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this article, or opposing any policy or practice or act that is prohibited by this article.

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption of unlawful retaliation if an employer denies an employee the right to use accrued sick days, discharges, threatens to discharge, demotes, suspends, or in any manner discriminates against an employee within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) The filing of a complaint by the employee with the Labor Commissioner or alleging a violation of this article.

(B) The cooperation of an employee with an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this article.

(C) Opposition by the employee to a policy, practice, or act that is prohibited by this article.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 245.5, for purposes of this section,
 “employee” shall include an employee described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 245.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 148, Sec. 6.   (AB 406)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

247.

(a) In each workplace of the employer, the employer shall display a poster in a conspicuous place containing all the information specified in subdivision (b). The Labor Commissioner shall create a poster containing this information and make it available to employers.

(b) The poster shall state all of the following:

(1) An employee is entitled to accrue, request, and use paid
 sick days.

(2) The amount of sick days provided for by this article.

(3) The terms of use of paid sick days.

(4) That retaliation or discrimination against an employee who requests paid sick days or uses paid sick days, or both, is prohibited and that an employee has the right under this article to file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner against an employer who retaliates or discriminates against the employee.

(c) An employer who
 willfully violates the posting requirements of this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 317, Sec. 3.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

247.5.

(a) An employer shall keep for at least three years records documenting the hours worked and paid sick days accrued and used by an employee, and shall allow the Labor Commissioner to access these records pursuant to the requirements set forth in Section 1174. An employer shall make these records available to an employee in the same manner as described in Section 226. If an employer does not maintain adequate records pursuant to this section, it shall be presumed that the employee is entitled to the maximum number of hours accruable under this article, unless the employer can show otherwise by clear and convincing evidence.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, an employer
 is not obligated to inquire into or record the purposes for which an employee uses paid leave or paid time off.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.   (AB 304)   Effective July 13, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

248.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(2) “Food sector worker” means any person who satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The person satisfies one or more of the following criteria:

(i) The person works in an industry or occupation defined in paragraph (B) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 3-2001, paragraph (H) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 8-2001, paragraph (H) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 13-2001, or paragraph (D) of Section 2 of IWC
 Wage Order 14-2001.

(ii) The person works for a hiring entity that operates a food facility, as defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) The person delivers food from a food facility, as defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code, for or through a hiring entity.

(B) The person leaves the person’s home or other place of residence to perform work for or through the person’s hiring entity.

(3) “Hiring entity” means a private sole proprietorship or any kind of private entity whatsoever, including, but not limited to, any kind of corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or any other kind of business enterprise, and specifically including, but not limited to, any delivery network
 company, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6041.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and any transportation network company, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code, that has 500 or more employees in the United States. For purposes of this paragraph, Section 826.40(a)(1) and (2) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be used to determine the number of employees that the hiring entity employs.

(4) “IWC Wage Order” means a wage order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(b) A food sector worker shall be entitled to COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) A hiring entity shall provide COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to each food sector worker who performs work for or through the hiring entity if that food sector worker is
 unable to work due to any of the following reasons:

(A) The food sector worker is subject to a federal, state, or local quarantine or isolation order related to COVID-19.

(B) The food sector worker is advised by a health care provider to self-quarantine or self-isolate due to concerns related to COVID-19.

(C) The food sector worker is prohibited from working by the food sector worker’s hiring entity due to health concerns related to the potential transmission of COVID-19.

(2) A food sector worker shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A food sector worker is entitled to 80 hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid
 sick leave, if the food sector worker satisfies either of the following criteria:

(i) The hiring entity considers the food sector worker to work “full time.”

(ii) The food sector worker worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least 40 hours per week for the hiring entity in the two weeks preceding the date the food sector worker took COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) A food sector worker who does not satisfy either of the criteria in subparagraph (A) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(i) If the food sector worker has a normal weekly schedule, the total number of hours the food sector worker is normally scheduled to work for or through a hiring entity over two weeks.

(ii) If the food sector worker works a variable number of hours, 14 times the average number of hours the food sector worker worked each day for or through the hiring entity in the six months preceding the date the food sector worker took COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave. If the food sector worker has worked for the hiring entity fewer than six months, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the food sector worker has worked for the hiring entity.

(C) The total number of hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to which a food sector worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the food sector worker under Section 246, but shall not be in addition to the total number of hours of supplemental paid sick leave available to the worker under Executive
 Order N-51-20.

(D) A food sector worker may determine how many hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the food sector worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B). The hiring entity shall make COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave available for immediate use by the food sector worker, upon the oral or written request of the worker to the hiring entity.

(E) A hiring entity is not required to provide a food sector worker more than the total number of hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to which the food sector worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) above.

(3) (A) Each hour of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at a rate equal to the
 highest of the following:

(i) The food sector worker’s regular rate of pay for the food sector worker’s last pay period.

(ii) The state minimum wage.

(iii) The local minimum wage to which the food sector worker is entitled.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a hiring entity shall not be required to pay more than five hundred eleven dollars ($511) per day and five thousand one hundred ten dollars ($5,110) in the aggregate to a food sector worker for COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave taken by the worker.

(4) A hiring entity shall not require a food sector worker to use any other paid or unpaid leave, paid time off, or vacation time provided by the hiring entity to the food
 sector worker before the food sector worker uses COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a hiring entity already provides the relevant food sector worker with a supplemental benefit, such as supplemental paid leave, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and that would compensate the food sector worker in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for taking COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to which the food sector worker would otherwise be entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the hiring entity may count the hours of the other paid benefit or leave towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave that the hiring entity is required to provide to the food sector worker under paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b). For purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental paid benefit or leave that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the food sector worker is entitled under Section 246, but may include paid leave already provided by the hiring entity pursuant to Executive Order N-51-20 or supplemental paid leave provided pursuant to federal or local law for the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) In addition to other remedies as may be provided by the laws of this state or its subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the remedies available to redress any unlawful business practice under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, the Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section. For purposes of such enforcement and to implement COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave, this section shall apply as
 follows:

(A) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section as if COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave constitutes “paid sick days,” “paid sick leave,” or “sick leave” under subdivision (n) of Section 246, subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 246.5, Section 247, Section 247.5, and Section 248.5. Any claim by a covered worker that is enforceable by the Labor Commissioner for supplemental paid sick leave pursuant to Executive Order N-51-20 shall also be enforceable through this section.

(B) Section 249 applies to COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave.

(2) For purposes of sections of this code cited in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), in construing this section all food sector workers shall be considered employees and any hiring entity shall be considered an employer.

(e) The requirement to provide COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section applies retroactively to April 16, 2020, and shall expire on December 31, 2020 or upon the expiration of any federal extension of the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), whichever is later, except that a food sector worker taking COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave to which that food sector worker otherwise would have been entitled under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 45, Sec. 3.   (AB 1867)   Effective September 9, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

248.1.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(2) “Covered worker” means any person who satisfies the following criteria:

(A) The person satisfies one or more of the following criteria:

(i) The person is employed by a hiring entity, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(ii) The person is employed as a health care provider or emergency responder, as defined under Section 826.30(c) of
 Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, by a hiring entity as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) that has elected to exclude such employees from emergency paid sick leave under the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127).

(B) The person satisfying one or more of the criteria in subparagraph (A) leaves the person’s home or other place of residence to perform work for the person’s hiring entity.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a “covered worker” shall not include any of the following:

(i) A person who works in an industry or occupation defined in paragraph (B) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 3-2001, paragraph (H) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 8-2001, paragraph (H) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 13-2001, or paragraph (D) of Section 2 of IWC Wage Order 14-2001.

(ii) A person who works for a hiring entity that operates a food facility, as defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A person who delivers food from a food facility, as defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code, for or through a hiring entity.

(3) “Hiring entity” means either of the following:

(A) A private sole proprietorship or any kind of private entity whatsoever, including, but not limited to, any kind of corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or any other kind of business enterprise that has 500 or more employees in the United States. For purposes of this paragraph, Section 826.40(a)(1) and (2) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be used to determine
 the number of employees that the hiring entity employs.

(B) An entity, including a public entity, that employs health care providers or emergency responders as defined under Section 826.30(c) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and that has elected to exclude such employees from emergency paid sick leave under the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127).

(4) “IWC Wage Order” means a wage order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(b) A covered worker shall be entitled to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) A hiring entity shall provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to each covered worker who performs work for the hiring entity if that covered worker is unable to work due to any of the
 following reasons:

(A) The covered worker is subject to a federal, state, or local quarantine or isolation order related to COVID-19.
